Utah statutes.
53A-17a-131.15.   State contribution for the Electronic High School.

Money appropriated to the State Board of Education for the Electronic High School shall be distributed to the school according to rules established by the board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

